Montana, session 2025, SB441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Montana block management enforcement network. (1) The Montana block
management enforcement network is intended to establish a framework for assisting landowners enrolled in the
block management program established under 87-1-265 with enforcing compliance by hunters with the
landowner's rules and Montana law.
(2) Landowners enrolled in the block management program may opt-in to the Montana block
management enforcement network.
(3) By electing to opt-in to the Montana block management enforcement network, a landowner
does not waive any right to deny access to any property enrolled in the block management program for cause.
Additionally, a landowner may opt-out of the Montana block management enforcement network at any time and
may allow an individual who is subject to the restrictions of subsection (4) to access the landowner's property.
(4) Individuals accessing lands enrolled in the Montana block management enforcement network
shall adhere to all rules governing access to the block management property. Any conviction based on a
violation of those rules or any provision of Titles 45 or 87 by an individual while accessing lands enrolled in the
block management program must result in the following:
(a) for a first conviction, the individual must be prohibited from accessing all lands participating in
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 441
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 441
the Montana block management enforcement network for the remainder of the current license year;
(b) for a second conviction, the individual must be prohibited from accessing all lands participating
in the Montana block management enforcement network for up to 3 consecutive license years; and
(c) for a third conviction, the individual must be prohibited from accessing all lands participating in
the Montana block management enforcement network for life.
(5) The department shall provide educational information to individuals accessing private property
under the block management program regarding the requirement to adhere to all rules governing access to
those private lands and the consequences for violating those rules on private property enrolled in the Montana
block management enforcement network.
(6) The commission may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
87, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 441
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 441, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 441
INTRODUCED BY D. LOGE
AN ACT CREATING THE MONTANA BLOCK MANAGEMENT ENFORCEMENT NETWORK; ALLOWING
LANDOWNERS TO OPT-IN OR OPT-OUT OF THE MONTANA BLOCK MANAGEMENT ENFORCEMENT
NETWORK; CREATING ADDITIONAL RESTRICTIONS APPLICABLE TO LANDS ENROLLED IN THE
MONTANA BLOCK MANAGEMENT ENFORCEMENT NETWORK; REQUIRING THE DEPARTMENT TO
PROVIDE ADDITIONAL EDUCATION OPPORTUNITIES REGARDING THE MONTANA BLOCK
MANAGEMENT ENFORCEMENT NETWORK; AND PROVIDING RULEMAKING AUTHORITY.”